dictionaries/gsc_FR/gsc_FR.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY aesrnit-'lmoucèvdpzhbgàqjféí·òçxóïúükAyEMSCLBPwGITORVDFJN.UHZÈÒQÀœöXKWÍãëñÇY

MAP 6
MAP eêëéè
MAP oöòó
MAP iïí
MAP úü
MAP aàã
MAP cç

PFX A Y 1
PFX A   0          des        [íéóòèaàcbedgfihjmlonqpsrutv]             # 262969

PFX B Y 3
PFX B   0          vs'arrèr   [hcsg]                                    # 266
PFX B   0          v'aveu     [sd]                                      # 110
PFX B   0          v          [aàeièíoésrutò]                           # 239460

PFX C Y 1
PFX C   0          b'         [aàeièíoéóòuú]                            # 236243

PFX D Y 1
PFX D   0          v'         [aàeièíoéóòuú]                            # 236242

PFX E Y 3
PFX E   0          tortil     [hl]                                      # 365
PFX E   0          talabar    [sd]                                      # 308
PFX E   0          t'         [aàeièíoéóòuú]                            # 236244

PFX F Y 3
PFX F   0          vs'esbor   [rl]                                      # 164
PFX F   0          vorrol     [h]                                       # 364
PFX F   0          vs'        [aàeièíoéóòuú]                            # 236240

PFX G Y 1
PFX G   0          m'         [aàeièíoéóòuú]                            # 236242

PFX H Y 3
PFX H   0          n'ahre     [smdg]                                    # 1
PFX H   0          qu'empoc   [h]                                       # 126
PFX H   0          qu'        [aàeièíoéóòuú]                            # 236244

PFX I Y 1
PFX I   0          a          [cbdgfihjmlonqpsrutvxç]                   # 101571

PFX J Y 1
PFX J   0          d          [aàeièmoéóruò]                            # 49483

PFX K Y 3
PFX K   0          desfi      [sldn]                                    # 345
PFX K   0          despul     [h]                                       # 363
PFX K   0          d'         [aAeàièÀÍoIòuOÈyEúUüÒ]                    # 47886

SFX L Y 1
SFX L   0          n          [aàeéèímïióruo]            # 462886

SFX M Y 2
SFX M   0          'n         [aàeièíé]                  # 299930
SFX M   0          egem-ve'n  [cbdihmlonpsrutv]          # 282

SFX N Y 1
SFX N   0          m          [aedgièkoòuhr]             # 250332

SFX O Y 2
SFX O   0          -n'i        [se]                       # 248472
SFX O   0          uem-nse-n'i [qaeionsruï]                # 134

SFX P Y 4
SFX P   0          -me        [acbdgpihmçonésrutvzè]     # 245653
SFX P   0          -te        [acbdgpihmçonésrutvzè]     # 245653
SFX P   0          -ve        [acbdgpihmçonésrutvzè]     # 245653
SFX P   0          -nse       [acbdgpihmçonésrutvzè]     # 245653

SFX Q Y 3
SFX Q   0          etz-las-te [cbdgihmlnpsrtv]           # 253
SFX Q   0          -ne        [asuon]                   # 204349
SFX Q   0          mèsse      [aeiosru]                  # 133

SFX R Y 4
SFX R   0          s-me       [aeiíoòu]                  # 102182
SFX R   0          z-se       [t]                        # 9835
SFX R   0          ssegèsse   [aueo]                     # 122
SFX R   0          sa-las-nse [aeimlonpsrutò]            # 163

SFX S Y 3
SFX S   0          im-te      [cbdghmnpsrut]             # 125
SFX S   0          s-ne       [auo]                     # 102174
SFX S   0          lhe        [iaeuo]                   # 694

SFX T Y 2
SFX T   0          s-nse      [aeiíoòu]                 # 102182
SFX T   0          eja'u-nse  [cbdihmlonpsrut]           # 279

SFX U Y 4
SFX U   0          s-te        [aeiíoòu]                  # 102182
SFX U   0          quem-las-te [aeionsruï]                # 134
SFX U   0          s-ve        [aeiíoòu]                  # 102182
SFX U   0          catz-la-ne  [aeionsruï]                # 134

SFX V Y 1
SFX V   0          ram        [acbedièíoórut]            # 85588

SFX W Y 2
SFX W   0          s-i        [ao]                       # 82824
SFX W   0          em-s'i     [cbedgfihmlonpsrutvxz]     # 1459

SFX X Y 2
SFX X   0          -i         [as]                       # 82825
SFX X   0          gi         [aeièonrut]                # 1102

SFX Y Y 2
SFX Y   0          -li        [aécbdçpihvmngsrutèz]      # 80005
SFX Y   0          -se        [aécbdçpihvmngsrutèz]      # 80005

SFX a Y 2
SFX a   0          s-se       [aeiíòu]                   # 19358
SFX a   0          -las-ve    [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305

SFX b Y 1
SFX b   0          i          [òhacbedgfièmlonpsrutvxz]  # 57628

SFX c Y 2
SFX c   0          z-los-ve   [t]                       # 9835
SFX c   0          -la-nse    [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305

SFX d Y 4
SFX d   0          m-se-n'i   [ièea]                     # 8609
SFX d   0          lizavi     [ai]                       # 123
SFX d   0          s-n'i      [o]                        # 41412
SFX d   0          eja-te-n'i [cbdihmlonpsrut]           # 279

SFX e Y 1
SFX e   0          am         [cbegçfihmlonpsrutvxzd]   # 50229

SFX f Y 1
SFX f   0          em         [cbedgfihmlonpsrutvxz]     # 48748

SFX g Y 1
SFX g   0          èi         [cbedgfihjmlonpsrutvxz]    # 47925

SFX h Y 3
SFX h   0          escam      [cbdghmnpsrutv]            # 340
SFX h   0          sim        [aeèímnsòu]                # 47024
SFX h   0          ssaram     [iaueo]                   # 467

SFX i Y 1
SFX i   0          sem        [aeimlonpsrut]             # 47561

SFX j Y 2
SFX j   0          segèssem   [iesuo]                   # 134
SFX j   0          ssem       [aeièíoóu]                 # 47367

SFX k Y 2
SFX k   0          ssim       [àeèíoóu                  # 46920
SFX k   0          ejarem     [cbdihmlonpsrut]           # 367

SFX l Y 2
SFX l   0          àn         [r]                       # 45522
SFX l   0          naràn      [aegimorut]                # 416

SFX m Y 3
SFX m   0          én         [r]                       # 45520
SFX m   0          ven        [aeièloruò]                # 117
SFX m   0          ularén     [acedgihmpst]              # 117

SFX n Y 2
SFX n   0          sejavi     [iesuo]                   # 134
SFX n   0          -l'i       [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305

SFX o Y 2
SFX o   0          uin        [cdghjnt]                 # 177
SFX o   0          sin        [aeièmlonpsòutr]           # 41141

SFX p Y 1
SFX p   0          -se'n      [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41318

SFX q Y 1
SFX q   0          -te'n      [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41306

SFX r Y 37
SFX r   0          -ve'n      [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -nse'n     [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -me'n      [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -li'n      [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -la'n      [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -v'i       [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -los-n'i   [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -se-n'i    [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -ve-n'i    [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -s'i       [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -t'i       [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -las-i     [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -m'i       [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -me-n'i    [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -ns'i      [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -los-i     [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -nse-n'i   [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -te-n'i    [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -lo-te     [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -las-te    [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -las-nse   [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -las-ne    [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -los-ne    [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -la-te     [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -lo-ne     [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -los-me    [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -los-nse   [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -los-te    [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -los-ve    [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -las-me    [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -lo-me     [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -la-me     [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -lo-ve     [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -la-ve     [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -lo-nse    [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -la-ne     [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305
SFX r   0          -lo        [aécbdgihvmçnpsrutèz]      # 41305

SFX s Y 1
SFX s   0          si         [aeièmlonpsòutr]           # 41145

SFX t Y 1
SFX t   0          se         [aeimlonpsòutr]            # 41138

SFX u Y 1
SFX u   0          sen        [aeièmlonpsòutr]           # 41128

SFX v Y 1
SFX v   0          ri         [acbedièorut]              # 41102

SFX w Y 2
SFX w   0          í'u-li     [cbdghmnpsrutv]            # 126
SFX w   0          ssi        [aeièou]                   # 40947

SFX x Y 2
SFX x   0          dejar      [aeionru]                  # 125
SFX x   0          sse        [aeièïuo]                  # 40945

SFX y Y 2
SFX y   0          dejarén    [aeionru]                  # 119
SFX y   0          ssin       [aeièouv]                   # 40948
